Idaho, session 2025, H0394.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6610, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6610. CONTRIBUTION IN EXCESS OF FIFTY DOLLARS.
(1)(a) Any person who contributes more than fifty dollars ($50.00),
(including one (1) or more smaller contributions which aggregate more
than fifty dollars ($50.00) in any one (1) calendar year), to a candi-
date or political committee shall accompany the contribution with a
statement of his full name and complete address.
(b) If a political treasurer is offered or receives a payment or con-
tribution of more than fifty dollars ($50.00), or which together with
prior contributions from the same person during that calendar year ex-
ceeds fifty dollars ($50.00), and there is no statement of the full name
and complete address of the person making the contribution, the contri-
bution shall be returned to the contributor if his identity can be as-
certained. If the contributor's identity cannot be ascertained, the
contribution shall be transmitted immediately by the political trea-
surer who received it to the state controller for deposit in the public
school fund.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, if any candidate or political committee engages in commercial
sales of merchandise at an event or through online transactions, the
political treasurer shall be exempt from recording and reporting each
individual commercial sale transaction, as long as:
(i) The total amount of a single transaction is less than two hun-
dred dollars ($200);
(ii) The total amount of merchandise sales and total amount of the
cost of goods sold are reported to the secretary of state;
(iii) The items sold are available to the general public as a nomi-
nal retail transaction; and
(iv) Items of limited availability with a quantity of five (5) or
fewer at the commencement of an event or sale shall not be included
as commercial sale items.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, items
categorized as commercial sale items shall be exempt from the provi-
sions of chapter 36, title 63, Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.